Wisconsin, session 2025, SB649.
do enact as follows:SB649,11Section 1. 146.907 of the statutes is created to read:SB649,2,22146.907 Prohibition on certain genetic software. (1) In this section:SB649,2,63(a) “DNA” means deoxyribonucleic acid, ribonucleic acid, and chromosomes 4that may be analyzed to detect heritable diseases or conditions, including the 5identification of carriers, predicting risk of disease, or establishing a clinical 6diagnosis.SB649,2,87(b) “Foreign adversary” means a person determined to be a foreign adversary 8under 15 CFR 791.4.SB649,3,41(c) “Genetic analysis” means the testing or analysis of an identifiable 2individual’s DNA that results in information that is derived from the presence, 3absence, alteration, or mutation of an inherited gene or the presence or absence of a 4specific DNA marker. “Genetic analysis” does not include any of the following:SB649,3,551. A routine physical examination.SB649,3,662. A routine chemical, blood, or urine analysis.SB649,3,773. A test to identify the presence of drugs or HIV infection.SB649,3,984. A test performed due to the presence of signs, symptoms, or other 9manifestations of a disease, illness, impairment, or other disorder.SB649,3,1110(d) “Genetic sequencer” means any device or platform used to conduct genetic 11analysis, resequencing, isolation, or other genetic research.SB649,3,1312(e) “HIV” means any strain of human immunodeficiency virus, which causes 13acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.SB649,3,1514(f) “HIV infection” means the pathological state produced by a human body in 15response to the presence of HIV.SB649,3,1616(g) “Human genome” means DNA or ribonucleic acid found in human cells.SB649,3,2017(h) “Medical facility” means a facility for the delivery of health services that 18receives state moneys, including interagency pass-through appropriations from the 19federal government, and conducts research or testing on or relating to genetic 20analysis or the human genome.SB649,3,2321(i) “Operational or research software” means computer programs used for the 22operation, control, analysis, or other necessary functions of genetic analysis or 23genetic sequencers.SB649,4,224(j) “Research facility” means a facility that receives state moneys, including 1interagency pass-through appropriations from the federal government, and 2conducts research on or relating to genetic analysis or the human genome.SB649,4,83(2) No medical facility or research facility in this state may use a genetic 4sequencer used for genetic analysis or operational or research software used for 5genetic analysis that is produced in or by a foreign adversary, a company organized 6within the borders of a country that is a foreign adversary, or an owned or controlled 7subsidiary or affiliate of a company domiciled within the borders of a country that is 8a foreign adversary.SB649,4,169(3) No medical facility, research facility, company, or nonprofit organization 10may store any human genome sequencing data of a resident of this state at a 11location within the borders of country that is a foreign adversary, and each medical 12facility, research facility, company, or nonprofit organization shall ensure that such 13data is inaccessible to any person located within the borders of a country that is a 14foreign adversary. This subsection does not apply to the storage of human genome 15sequencing data that is collected as part of a clinical trial or other biomedical 16research study subject to, or conducted in accordance with, 28 CFR Part 202.SB649,4,2317(4) This section shall be enforced in the name and on behalf of the state by the 18attorney general. The attorney general may investigate an allegation of a violation 19of this section, and any person may notify the attorney general of a violation or 20potential violation of this section. Whoever violates this section shall forfeit 21$10,000 for each violation of the prohibitions in subs. (2) and (3). The attorney 22general may bring an action in the name of the state to collect any forfeiture 23imposed under this subsection.SB649,4,2424